Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-105.3, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-105.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-105.3. A. In addition to the licenses to operate
motor vehicles, Service Oklahoma may issue cards to Oklahoma
residents for purposes of identification only. The identification
cards shall be issued, renewed, replaced, canceled and denied in the
same manner as driver licenses in this state. Provided, any person
who holds both a driver license and identification card from
Oklahoma as of November 1, 2025, may continue to possess both
Req. No. 13872 Page 1

cred entials until the first expiration of either credential. At
that time, the person shall be allowed to retain, replace, or renew
either the driver license or identification card and shall surrender
the second credential to Service Oklahoma. A licensee whose record
reflects a notation of the person's proof of legal presence,
verified by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, or proof of
U.S. citizenship, may obtain a REAL ID Compliant Identification Card
or a Noncompliant Identification Card from a licensed operator or
Service Oklahoma, regardless of the status of the license held by
the licensee. Provided, the licensee must comply with all REAL ID
documentation requirements to obtain a REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card. A person shall not apply for or possess more
than one state-issued or territory-issued REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-101 of
this title.
The application for an identification card by any person under
the age of eighteen (18) years shall be signed and verified by a
custodial legal parent or legal guardian, either in person before a
person authorized to administer oaths or electronically if
completing an online application, or a notarized affidavit signed by
a custodial legal parent or legal guardian submitted before a person
authorized to administer oaths by the person under the age of
eighteen (18) years with the application. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the identification cards shall be valid
Req. No. 13872 Page 2

for a period of either four (4) years from the month of issuance or
eight (8) years from the month of issuance; however, the
identification cards issued to persons sixty-five (65) years of age
or older shall be valid indefinitely from the month of issuance.
B. 1. The Department of Corrections shall coordinate with
Service Oklahoma to provide REAL ID Noncompliant Identification
Cards to all inmates who do not have a current state-issued
identification card or driver license upon their release from
custody. The identification cards shall be issued, replaced,
canceled and denied in the same manner as driver licenses in this
state.
2. Service Oklahoma shall allow the use of a certified copy of
a birth certificate coupled with a Department of Corrections-issued
consolidated record card to serve as a valid form of photo
identification documentation to obtain a REAL ID Noncompliant
Identification Card.
3. REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Cards issued with a
consolidated record card from the Department of Corrections for
inmates shall be valid for a period of four (4) years from the month
of issuance for an allowable fee to be determined by Service
Oklahoma and are nonrenewable and nontransferable.
4. The fee charged for the issuance or replacement of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card pursuant to this subsection shall
be deposited in the Department of Public Safety Revolving Fund
Req. No. 13872 Page 3

thro ugh October 31, 2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, this fee
shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund.
Provided, however, REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Cards issued
to individuals required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Registration Act shall only be valid for a period of one (1) year.
No person sixty-five (65) years of age or older shall be charged a
fee for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card.
5. No Oklahoma student ages fourteen (14) to eighteen (18)
shall be charged a fee for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification
Card. For purposes of this section, "student" means a person
enrolled in ninth, tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade in a public,
private, or other school, or educated by other means and receiving
instruction equivalent to ninth, tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade,
within the State of Oklahoma.
6. Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules and
procedures to implement the provisions of this subsection.
C. No person shall hold more than one state-issued or
territory-issued driver license or identification card, as defined
in subsection G of Section 6-101 of this title. Service Oklahoma
shall not issue an identification card to any applicant who has been
previously issued a driver license or identification card unless
such license or identification card has been surrendered to Service
Oklahoma by the applicant. Provided, any person who holds both a
driver license and identification card from Oklahoma as of November
Req. No. 13872 Page 4

1, 2 025, may continue to possess both credentials until the first
expiration of either credential. At that time, the person shall be
allowed to retain, replace, or renew either the driver license or
identification card and shall surrender the second credential to
Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma may promulgate rules related to
the issuance of replacement REAL ID Compliant Identification Cards
in the event of loss or theft.
D. The fee charged for the issuance or renewal of a REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)
for a 4-year card and Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for an 8-year card.
The fee charged for the issuance or renewal of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card pursuant to this section shall be
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for a 4-year card and Fifty Dollars
($50.00) for an 8-year card; however, no person sixty-five (65)
years of age or older, student as described in paragraph 5 of
subsection B of this section, or one hundred percent (100%) disabled
veteran described in subsection P of Section 6-101 of this title
shall be charged a fee for an identification card. Of each fee
charged pursuant to the provisions of this subsection:
1. Seven Dollars ($7.00) of a 4-year card and Fourteen Dollars
($14.00) of an 8-year card shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title;
2. Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year card and Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be credited to the Department of
Req. No. 13872 Page 5

Publ ic Safety Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used
solely for the purpose of the administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of the Department through October 31,
2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year
card and Six Dollars ($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be credited to
the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be
used solely for the purpose of administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year card and Twenty Dollars
($20.00) of an 8-year card shall be deposited in the Department of
Public Safety Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning
November 1, 2022, this fee shall be deposited in the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund;
4. Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year card and Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title; and
5. Two Dollars ($2.00) for a 4-year card and Four Dollars
($4.00) for an 8-year card of the fee authorized by this subsection
related to the issuance or renewal of an identification card by a
licensed operator that does process approved applications or
renewals for REAL ID Compliant and REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
Licenses or Identification Cards shall be retained by the licensed
operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this title.

Req. No. 13872 Page 6

E. The fee charged for replacement of a REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card, or REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card,
shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00); however, no person sixty-five
(65) years of age or older, nor any student as described in
paragraph 5 of subsection B of this section, shall be charged a fee
for an identification card replacement. Of each fee charged
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection:
1. Seven Dollars ($7.00) shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title;
2. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be credited to the Department of
Public Safety Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used
solely for the purpose of the administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of the Department through October 31,
2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be
credited to the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving
Fund to be used solely for the purpose of administration and
maintenance of the computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be deposited in the Department of
Public Safety Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning
November 1, 2022, this fee shall be deposited in the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund;
4. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title; and

Req. No. 13872 Page 7

5. Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this subsection
related to the replacement of an identification card by a licensed
operator that does process approved applications or renewals for
REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses or
Identification Cards shall be retained by the licensed operator
pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this title.
F. The Oklahoma Tax Commission is hereby authorized to
reimburse, from funds available to that agency, each licensed
operator issuing an identification card to a person sixty-five (65)
years of age or older, an amount not to exceed One Dollar ($1.00)
for each card or driver license so issued through June 30, 2023.
The Tax Commission shall develop procedures for claims for
reimbursement.
G. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a person
makes application for a new identification card, or makes
application to renew an identification card, and the person has been
convicted of, or received a deferred judgment for, any offense
required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act,
the identification card shall be valid for a period of one (1) year
from the month of issuance, but may be renewed yearly during the
time the person is subject to registration on the Sex Offender
Registry. The cost for such identification card shall be the same
as for other identification cards and renewals.

Req. No. 13872 Page 8

H. Nothing in this section requires or authorizes the
Department of Public Safety to issue a REAL ID Noncompliant
Identification Card without the documentation required by the
provisions of paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this
title.

60-2-13872 SW 10/23/25

















Req. No. 13872 Page 9